Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-136
State budget; estimates; hearing; when authorized.

The Governor may provide for public hearings on any and all estimates included in the budget, which shall be held between November 15 and December 15 in the year preceding the regular session of the Legislature.

Laws 1921, c. 210, § 12, p. 749;

C.S.1922, § 7279;

C.S.1929, § 81-312;

R.S.1943, § 81-136.